District of Columbia statutes.
10-1102.02a

Fee waiver.

The first $83,000 of annual rent for use of public space, established pursuant to § 10-1102.02, shall be waived for the use of land between Lot 16, Square 3832 and Lot 47, Square 3831.

Oct. 17, 1968, 82 Stat. 1158, Pub. L. 90-596, title II, § 202a
as added Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6152, 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7016(g)(2) and (y)(1) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).